New Mexico, session 2026, SB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2030 to construct, equip and furnish a building for primary health care in Taos county. Any unexpended balance remaining six months after completion of the project or no later than the end of fiscal year 2030 shall revert to the general fund. .232869.1